Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB422.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.13) The following shall apply:(1) When calculating taxable income on the annual personal income tax return, a taxpayer may deduct an amount not to exceed twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) if, while living, the taxpayer 123456789101112131415161718192021 or the taxpayer's dependent donates one or more of his or her human organs to another human being for human organ transplantation and incurs any of the following unreimbursed expenses which are related to the organ donation:(i) Travel expenses.(ii) Lodging expenses.(iii) Lost wages.(iv) Medical expenses.(2) Subject to the restriction under paragraph (1), the taxpayer may only deduct an amount equal to the unreimbursed expenses incurred by the taxpayer under paragraph (1). The deduction may not result in taxable income being less than zero.(3) A deduction under this subsection may only be claimed in the taxable year in which the human organ transplantation occurred. A taxpayer may claim the deduction under this subsection only one time during the taxpayer's lifetime.(4) As used in this subsection, the term "human organ" means all or part of a liver, pancreas, kidney, intestine, lung or bone marrow.* * *Section 2. The addition of section 303(a.13) of the act shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0422PN0398 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223